th: โปรโตคอลการสตรีมไร้สายที่รองรับ: AirPlay 2; บลูทูธเท่านั้น; Chromecast ในตัว; DLNA; พร้อมใช้งาน Roon; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; อื่นๆ
it: Protocolli di streaming wireless supportati: AirPlay 2; Solo Bluetooth; Chromecast integrato; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Altro
ko: 지원 무선 스트리밍 프로토콜: 에어플레이 2; 블루투스 전용; 크롬캐스트 내장; DLNA; 룬 레디; 스포티파이 커넥트; 타이달 커넥트; UPnP; 기타
lt-LT: Palaikomi belaidžio transliavimo protokolai: AirPlay 2; Tik Bluetooth; Integruotas Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Kita
pt-PT: Protocolos de streaming sem fios suportados: AirPlay 2; Apenas Bluetooth; Chromecast integrado; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Outro
zh-CN: 支持的无线流媒体协议: AirPlay 2; 仅蓝牙; 内置 Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; 其他
bg-BG: Поддържани протоколи за безжичен стрийминг: AirPlay 2; Само Bluetooth; Вграден Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Други
fr: Protocoles de diffusion sans fil pris en charge: AirPlay 2; Bluetooth uniquement; Chromecast intégré; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Autre
da: Understøttede trådløse streamingprotokoller: AirPlay 2; Kun bluetooth; Chromecast indbygget; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Andet
tr: Desteklenen kablosuz akış protokolleri: AirPlay 2; Yalnızca Bluetooth; Dahili Chromecast; DLNA; Roon hazır; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Diğer
nb: Trådløse strømmeprotokoller støttet: AirPlay 2; Kun Bluetooth; Innebygd Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Annet
hr-HR: Podržani protokoli bežičnog strujanja: AirPlay 2; Samo bluetooth; Ugrađen chromecast; DLNA; Roon ready; Spotify connect; Tidal connect; UPnP; Ostalo
ro-RO: Protocoale de streaming wireless acceptate: AirPlay 2; Doar Bluetooth; Chromecast integrat; DLNA; Compatibil Roon; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Altele
pl: Obsługiwane protokoły bezprzewodowego przesyłania strumieniowego: AirPlay 2; Tylko Bluetooth; Wbudowany Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Inne
zh-TW: 支援的無線串流協定: AirPlay 2; 僅藍牙; 內建 Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; 其他
es: Protocolos de transmisión inalámbrica admitidos: AirPlay 2; Solo bluetooth; Chromecast integrado; DLNA; Compatible con Roon; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Otros
hu: Támogatott vezeték nélküli streaming protokollok: AirPlay 2; Csak bluetooth; Beépített Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Egyéb
el: Υποστηριζόμενα πρωτόκολλα ασύρματης ροής: AirPlay 2; Μόνο bluetooth; Ενσωματωμένο chromecast; DLNA; Roon ready; Spotify connect; Tidal connect; UPnP; Άλλο
sk-SK: Podporované bezdrôtové streamovacie protokoly: AirPlay 2; Iba Bluetooth; Vstavaný Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Iné
fi: Tuetut langattomat suoratoistoprotokolat: AirPlay 2; Vain Bluetooth; Sisäänrakennettu Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Muu
de: Unterstützte drahtlose Streaming-Protokolle: AirPlay 2; Nur Bluetooth; Integrierter Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Sonstiges
nl: Ondersteunde draadloze streamingprotocollen: AirPlay 2; Alleen bluetooth; Chromecast ingebouwd; DLNA; Roon ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Andere
ru: Поддерживаемые протоколы беспроводной трансляции: AirPlay 2; Только Bluetooth; Встроенный Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Другой
ja: サポートされるワイヤレスストリーミングプロトコル: AirPlay 2; Bluetoothのみ; Chromecast built-in; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; その他
vi: Giao thức phát trực tuyến không dây được hỗ trợ: AirPlay 2; Chỉ bluetooth; Chromecast tích hợp; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Khác
sl-SI: Podprti protokoli brezžičnega pretakanja: AirPlay 2; Samo bluetooth; Vgrajen chromecast; DLNA; Roon ready; Spotify connect; Tidal connect; UPnP; Drugo
cs: Podporované protokoly bezdrátového streamování: AirPlay 2; Pouze bluetooth; Vestavěný chromecast; DLNA; Roon ready; Spotify connect; Tidal connect; UPnP; Jiné
en: Wireless streaming protocols supported: AirPlay 2; Bluetooth only; Chromecast built-in; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Other
sv: Trådlösa strömningsprotokoll som stöds: AirPlay 2; Endast bluetooth; Inbyggd Chromecast; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Övrigt
pt-BR: Protocolos de streaming sem fio suportados: AirPlay 2; Somente Bluetooth; Chromecast integrado; DLNA; Roon Ready; Spotify Connect; Tidal Connect; UPnP; Outro